Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

Administrative rules and regulations.

General rules of the Georgia Public Service Commission and of the State Department of Transportation, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Public Service Commission, Chapter 515-3-1, and Rules of State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-1.

46-1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term:

“Certificate” means a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued pursuant to this title.

“Commission” means the Public Service Commission.

“Company” shall include a corporation, a firm, a partnership, an association, or an individual.

“Electric utility” means any retail supplier of electricity whose rates are fixed by the commission.

“Gas company” means any person certificated under Article 2 of Chapter 4 of this title to construct or operate any pipeline or distribution system, or any extension thereof, for the transportation, distribution, or sale of natural or manufactured gas.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, trust, private or public corporation, municipality, county, political subdivision, public authority, cooperative, association, or public or private organization of any character.

“Railroad corporation” or “railroad company” means all corporations, companies, or individuals owning or operating any railroad in this state. This title shall apply to all persons, firms, and companies, and to all associations of persons, whether incorporated or otherwise, that engage in business as common carriers upon any of the lines of railroad in this state, as well as to railroad corporations and railroad companies as defined in this Code section.

“Rate,” when used in this title with respect to an electric utility, means any rate, charge, classification, or service of an electric utility or any rule or regulation relating thereto.

“Utility” means any person who is subject in any way to the lawful jurisdiction of the commission.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2038, 2039; Code 1868, §§ 2039, 2040; Code 1873, §§ 2065, 2066; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 12; Code 1882, §§ 719l, 2065, 2066; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2199, 2263, 2264, 2267; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2642, 2711, 2712, 2715; Ga. L. 1931, Ex. Sess., p. 99, § 2; Ga. L. 1931, p. 199, §§ 2, 33; Ga. L. 1933, p. 198, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 18-101, 18-201, 68-502, 68-601, 93-101; Ga. L. 1939, p. 207, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 179, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1129, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 630, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 30, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 365, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 224, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1190, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 197, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 651, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 479, § 1; Code 1933, § 93-102, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46; Ga. L. 1982, p. 410, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 827, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1983, p. 735, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1394, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1394, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1283, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1090, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 709, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 579, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 46; Ga. L. 1994, p. 661, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1238, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 14; Ga. L. 1996, p. 950, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, §§ 9-1, 9-2, 9-3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 46; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1378, § 8; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 28-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2007, p. 607, § 1/HB 317; Ga. L. 2007, p. 679, § 1/HB 389; Ga. L. 2009, p. 669, § 1/HB 440; Ga. L. 2011, p. 479, § 18/HB 112; Ga. L. 2012, p. 580, § 14/HB 865; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 46/HB 942.

The 2002 amendments.

The first 2002 amendment, effective April 18, 2002, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “by the Public Service Commission” preceding “pursuant to this title” in paragraph (2) and substituted “Department of Motor Vehicle Safety” for “Public Service Commission” in paragraph (18). The second 2002 amendment, effective July 1, 2002, rewrote paragraph (7); rewrote subparagraph (9)(C); and, in paragraph (11), substituted “United States Department of Transportation” for “interstate Commerce Commission” and inserted “passenger” near the middle.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “commission” for “commissioner of motor vehicle safety” in paragraph (7); deleted “, provided that they do not operate to or from fixed termini outside of such limits and to any dray or truck which operates within the corporate limits of a city and is subject to regulation by the governing authority of such city or by the commissioner of motor vehicle safety and which goes beyond the corporate limits only for the purpose of hauling chattels which have been seized under any court process” at the end of
division (9)(C)(ii); in division (9)(C)(x), substituted “commissioner of public safety” for “commissioner of motor vehicle safety” three times and inserted “and the Environment” following “Senate Natural Resources” in the next-to-last sentence; deleted division (9)(C)(xii), which read: “Motor vehicles engaged in compensated intercorporate hauling whereby transportation of property is provided by a person who is a member of a corporate family for other members of such corporate family, provided:

“(I)
The parent corporation notifies the commissioner of motor vehicle safety of its intent or the intent of one of the subsidiaries to provide the transportation;

“(II)
The notice contains a list of participating subsidiaries and an affidavit that the parent corporation owns directly or indirectly a 100 percent interest in each of the subsidiaries;

“(III)
A copy of the notice is carried in the cab of all vehicles conducting the transportation; and

“(IV)
The transportation entity of the corporate family registers the compensated intercorporate hauling operation with the commissioner of motor vehicle safety, registers and identifies any of its vehicles, and becomes subject to the commissioner’s liability insurance and motor common carrier and motor contract carrier and hazardous materials transportation rules. For the purpose of this division, the term ‘corporate family’ means a group of corporations consisting of a parent corporation and all subsidiaries in which the parent corporation owns directly or indirectly a 100 percent interest;” substituted “state revenue commissioner” for “commissioner of motor vehicle safety” four times in division (9)(C)(xiii) and paragraphs (11) and (18), and
added “state revenue” preceding “commissioner’s” in division (9)(C)(xiii).

The 2007 amendments.

The first 2007 amendment, effective July 1, 2007, in division (9)(C)(ii), in the second sentence, substituted “such vehicles” for “taxicabs and buses” in the middle and added a period at the end, and added the last two sentences.
The second 2007 amendment, effective July 1, 2007, added the last sentence in subparagraph (9)(B) and substituted the present provisions of division (9)(C)(xiii) for the former provisions which read: “Vehicles, except limousines, transporting not more than ten persons for hire, except that any operator of such a vehicle is required to register the exempt operation with the state revenue commissioner, register and identify any of its vehicles, and become subject to the state revenue commissioner’s liability insurance and vehicle safety rules;”.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 4, 2009, added paragraphs (5.1), (6.2), and (6.3); in paragraph (6), near the beginning, inserted “ ‘compensation’ or ‘for’ ” and inserted “payment or other”, and added “or for hire, provided that no exempt rideshare shall be deemed to involve any element of transportation for compensation or for hire” at the end; and, in paragraph (13), deleted “or” at the end of subparagraph (13)(C), substituted “; or” for a period at the end of subparagraph (13)(D), and added subparagraph (13)(E).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of paragraph (8), which read: “ ‘Motor carrier of property’ means a motor common or contract carrier engaged in transporting property, except household goods, in intrastate commerce in this state.”; in subparagraph (9)(A), substituted “persons or household goods or engaged in the activity of nonconsensual towing pursuant to Code Section 44-1-13 for hire over any public highway in this state” for “persons or property for hire over any public highway in this state and not operated exclusively within the corporate limits of any city”, and added the last sentence; in subparagraph (9)(B), substituted “household goods” for “property”, and inserted “or engaged in the activity of nonconsensual towing pursuant to Code Section 44-1-13,” in the first sentence; in division (9)(C)(ii), deleted “drays, trucks, buses, and other motor vehicles” following “Taxicabs” in the first sentence and deleted the period following the first sentence, deleted the second through fourth sentences, relating to the exception of regulation by the governing authorities and tow trucks engaged in consensual towing, respectively, and added “the provisions of this division notwithstanding, vehicles and the drivers thereof operating within the corporate limits of any city shall be subject to the safety regulations adopted by the commissioner of public safety pursuant to Code Section 40-1-8” at the end of the present first sentence; substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of division (9)(C)(v), which read: “Granite trucks, where transportation from quarry to finishing plant involves not crossing more than two counties”; substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of division (9)(C)(vi), relating to RFD carriers and star-route carriers; substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of division (9)(C)(vii), relating to motor trucks of railway companies which perform pick-up and delivery; substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of division (9)(C)(ix), relating to single source leasing; substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of division (9)(C)(x), relating to motor vehicles engaged exclusively in the transportation of agricultural or dairy products; substituted “subparagraph” for “paragraph” at the end of division (9)(c)(xiii); substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of paragraph (11), relating to the definition of “permit”; and substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of paragraph (13), relating to the definition of “private carrier”; and substituted “commission” for “state revenue commissioner” at the end of paragraph (18).

The 2012 amendments.

The first 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, rewrote this Code section. The second 2012 amendment, effective May 1, 2012, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “renter’s” for “rentor’s” in subparagraph (5.1)(C). See Editor’s notes regarding the effect of these amendments.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, the definitions in this Code section were arranged in alphabetical order.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “Senate Natural Resources Committee” was substituted for “Senate Committee on Natural Resources” in the last sentence of division (9)(C)(x).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 13-1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2000 Act which amended this Code section becomes fully effective July 1, 2001, but authorizes administrative action commencing April 28, 2000, for purposes of appointing certain officials, adopting rules and regulations, employing personnel, and preparing for and phasing in full implementation; provided, however, that the Governor may by executive order extend the date for full implementation of the Act to no later than July 1, 2003. In accordance with an executive order issued June 29, 2001, by the Governor, the amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, became fully effective July 1, 2001.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 54(e)/HB 942, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2012 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to subparagraph (5.1)(C) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2012,
p. 775, 878, § 46(1)/HB 942, was not given effect.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 264 (1997).

46-1-2.
Measure of damages for wrongs and injuries by railroad companies generally; venue for actions against railroad companies and electric companies generally.

As used in this Code section, the term “electric company” means all corporations engaged in the business of either generating or transmitting electricity for light, heat, power, or other commercial purposes.

If any railroad company doing business in this state shall, in violation of any rule or regulation of the Public Service Commission, inflict any wrong or injury on any person, such person shall have a right of action and recovery for such wrong or injury in the county where the wrong or injury occurred and the damages which may be recovered in such actions shall be the same as in actions between individuals, provided that, in cases of willful violation of law, such railroad companies shall be liable for exemplary damages. All such actions under this subsection must be brought within 12 months after the commission of the alleged wrong or injury.

Any railroad, electric company, or gas company shall be sued by anyone whose person or property has been injured by such railroad, electric company, or gas company, or by its officers, agents, or employees, for the purpose of recovering damages for such injuries, in the county in which the cause of action originated; and causes of actions on all contracts shall be brought in the county in which the contract in question is made or is to be performed. If the cause of action arises in a county where the railroad, electric company, or gas company liable to suit has no agent, service may be perfected by the issuance of a second original, to be served upon the company in the county of its principal office and place of business, if in this state, and if not, on any agent of such company. In the alternative, if the company has no agent in the county where the cause of action arises, an action may be brought in the county of the residence of such company.

Whenever any:

Railroad or electric company incorporated under the laws of this state acquires by purchase, lease, or otherwise the ownership or control of the line of railroad of a competing railroad company in this state, in violation of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph V(c) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia;

Railroad or electric company incorporated under the laws of this state acquires by purchase, lease, or otherwise the ownership or control of the generating plant or transmission line of a competing electric company in this state, in violation of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph V(c) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia; or

Gas company incorporated under the laws of this state acquires by purchase, lease, or otherwise the ownership or control of the natural gas pipeline or distribution system of a competing gas company in this state, in violation of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph V(c) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia;

the venue of an action brought against the railroad, electric company, or gas company for the purpose of setting aside and having annulled such unlawful act of acquisition shall be in any county through which may run the line of railroad or in any county through which may run the transmission line of such electric company or in any county in which may be located the generating plant of such electric company or in any county through which may run the natural gas pipeline or distribution system so unlawfully acquired.

In any cause of action described in this Code section, any judgment rendered in any county other than one designated in this Code section shall be void.

The venue provisions of this Code section shall apply to the following electric companies:

An electric company owning a generating plant in one county and having its situs or principal office either in some other county of this state or beyond the limits of this state;

An electric company operating a generating plant, whether under lease or otherwise, in one county and having its situs or principal office either in some other county of this state or beyond the limits of this state;

An electric company owning a transmission line located in one county and having its situs or principal office in some other county of this state or beyond the limits of this state;

An electric company operating, whether under lease or otherwise, a transmission line located in one county and having its situs or principal office in some other county of this state or beyond the limits of this state;

An electric company owning a transmission line located in, or extending through, more than one county; and

An electric company operating, whether under lease or otherwise, a transmission line located in or extending through more than one county.

The venue provisions of this Code section shall apply to the following gas companies:

A gas company owning a natural gas pipeline or distribution system located in one county and having its situs or principal office in some other county of this state or beyond the limits of this state; and

A gas company owning a natural gas pipeline or distribution system located in, or extending through, more than one county.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 154, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1859, p. 48, § 1; Code 1863, § 3317; Code 1868, § 3329; Ga. L. 1869, p. 14, § 1; Code 1873, § 3406; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 10; Code 1882, §§ 719, 3406; Ga. L. 1892, p. 59, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2197, 2334; Ga. L. 1898, p. 50, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2640, 2798; Ga. L. 1912, p. 66, §§ 1-4; Code 1933, §§ 93-413, 94-1101; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 62; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 46; Ga. L. 1986, p. 37, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 46; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 46; Ga. L. 2013, p. 551, § 1/HB 194.

The 2004 amendment,

effective May 13, 2004, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (d).

The 2013 amendment,

effective May 6, 2013, substituted “subsection” for “title” in the last sentence of subsection (b); in subsection (c), in the first sentence, substituted “railroad, electric company, or gas company” for “railroad or electric company”, inserted “, or gas company,” and inserted “causes of”, and, in the second sentence, substituted “railroad, electric company, or gas company ” for “railroad or electric company” ; substituted the present provisions of subsection (d) for the former provisions, which read: “Whenever any railroad or electric company incorporated under the laws of this state acquires by purchase, lease, or otherwise the ownership or control of the line of railroad of a competing railroad company in this state, in violation of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph V(c) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia, or whenever any railroad or electric company incorporated under the laws of this state acquires by purchase, lease, or otherwise the ownership or control of the generating plant or transmission line of a competing electric company in this state, in violation of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph V(c) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia, the venue of an action brought against the railroad or electric company for the purpose of setting aside and having annulled such unlawful act of acquisition shall be in any county through which may run the line of railroad or in any county through which may run the transmission line of such electric company or in which may be located the generating plant of such electric company so unlawfully acquired.”; substituted the present provisions of the introductory paragraph of subsection (f) for the former provisions, which read:
“The following electric companies shall be embraced within the provisions of this Code section:”; and added subsection (g).
See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Time limitation on actions against railroads for injury to or death of employee, §

34-7-46

.

Venue for actions against lessees or possessors of railroads, §

46-8-310

.

Venue for actions against receivers, trustees, etc., of railroad companies, §

46-8-314

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 551, § 2/HB 194, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval and shall apply to causes of actions arising on or after such effective date.” The Governor approved this Act on May 6, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article discussing aspects of third party practice (impleader) under the Georgia Civil Practice Act (Ch. 11, T. 9), see 4 Ga. St. B. J. 355 (1968).

For article, “Statutes of Limitation: Counterproductive Complexities,” see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1985).

For annual survey trial practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 383 (1986).

For annual survey of recent developments, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 473 (1986).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 441 (1991).

For note discussing problems with venue in Georgia, and proposing statutory revisions to improve the resolution of venue questions, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 254 (1972).

46-1-3.
Applicability of powers granted by title to other companies or entities regulated by commission.

Notwithstanding the placement of any provision of law within this title, the powers granted by provisions of one Code section shall be applicable to any other company or entity regulated by the commission, where applicable.

46-1-4.
Applicability of title to carriers engaged in interstate commerce.

Unless otherwise provided by Georgia law and not preempted by federal law or unless provided or allowed by federal law, the provisions of this title relating to carriers engaged in the transportation of passengers or goods within this state shall not apply to carriers engaged in interstate commerce.

46-1-5.
Duties of Department of Human Services with regard to assistance to low or fixed income consumers of gas and electric service.

By March 2, 1982, the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Human Services) shall develop a program to identify those low or fixed income consumers of gas and electric utility service who, in the department’s opinion, should benefit from public assistance in paying their bills for gas and electric service. The department shall also establish an efficient and economical method for distributing to such consumers all public assistance funds which will be made available, whether by appropriations of state or federal funds, grants, or otherwise. All gas and electric utilities shall cooperate fully with the department in developing and implementing its program. Nothing in this Code section shall limit the commission’s authority to order regulatory alternatives which assist low or fixed income ratepayers.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 8; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-20/HB 228.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “(now known as the Department of Human Services)” in the first sentence of this Code section.

Cross references.

Public assistance generally, Ch. 4, T. 49.

46-1-6.
Governmental entities prohibited from restricting utility service connection or sale of fuels based on type; ability to choose utility service.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Governmental entity” means any:

Municipality, public corporation, political subdivision, instrumentality, body politic, authority, district, consolidated government, county, or any board, commission, agency, department, or board of any such entity;

State board, commission, agency, department, or board; or

Other form of government.

“Policy” means an ordinance, resolution, regulation, code, or any other requirement imposed by a governmental entity.

No governmental entity of this state shall adopt any policy that prohibits, or has the effect of prohibiting, based on the type or source of energy or fuel to be delivered:

The connection or reconnection of a customer to an electric utility, gas company, or natural, manufactured, or liquefied petroleum gas service;

Sales of liquefied petroleum gas, including, but not limited to, directly to a consumer by a retail establishment; or

Sales of other liquefied petroleum products.

Nothing in this Code section shall limit the ability of a governmental entity to choose utility services for properties owned by such governmental entity.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-1-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 583, § 1/HB 150.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 6, 2021.